Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 3 Security and Immigration Compliance

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Security and Immigration Compliance Act.’ All requirements of this Act concerning immigration or the classification of immigration status shall be construed in conformity with federal immigration law.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 2, purported to enact a new Article 4 of Chapter 10, Title 13, but actually enacted only Article 3 of Chapter 10, Title 13.

13-10-90.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor.

“Contractor” means a person or entity that enters into a contract for the physical performance of services.

“Federal work authorization program” means any of the electronic verification of work authorization programs operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security or any equivalent federal work authorization program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security to verify employment eligibility information of newly hired employees, commonly known as E-Verify, or any subsequent replacement program.

“Physical performance of services” means any performance of labor or services for a public employer using a bidding process or by contract wherein the labor or services exceed $2,499.99; provided, however, that such term shall not include any contract between a public employer and an individual who is licensed pursuant to Title 26 or Title 43 or by the State Bar of Georgia and is in good standing when such contract is for services to be rendered by such individual.

“Public employer” means every department, agency, or instrumentality of this state or a political subdivision of this state.

“Subcontractor” means a person or entity having privity of contract with a contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor and includes a contract employee or staffing agency.

“Sub-subcontractor” means a person or entity having privity of contract with a subcontractor or privity of contract with another person or entity contracting with a subcontractor or sub-subcontractor.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-90, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 2/SB 529; Ga. L. 2010, p. 308, § 2/SB 447; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 2/HB 87; Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 1/SB 160.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added paragraph (2.1). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “the Georgia Department of” following “Commissioner of” in paragraph (1); added paragraph (2); redesignated former paragraphs (2) through (4) as present paragraphs (3) through (6), respectively; in paragraph (3), inserted “employment eligibility” near the end and substituted “commonly known as E-Verify, or any subsequent replacement program” for “pursuant to the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (IRCA), D.L. 99-603” at the end; in paragraph (4), inserted “within this state” in two places; added “with more than one employee” at the end of paragraph (5); rewrote paragraph (6); and added paragraph (7). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “with a public employer” at the end of paragraph (2); rewrote paragraph (4), which read: “ ‘Physical performance of services’ means the building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing of any public structure or building or other public improvements of any kind to public real property within this state, including the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of all or part of a public road; or any other performance of labor for a public employer within this state under a contract or other bidding process.”; in paragraph (5), substituted “this state or a political subdivision of this state” for “the state or a political subdivision of the state with more than one employee”; and in paragraph (6), inserted “, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 308, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to contracts which are first advertised or otherwise given public notice on or after July 1, 2010.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) If any provision or part of any provision of this Act or the application of the same is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of this Act or any other part of this Act than can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this Act are severable.

“(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c) The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment by that Act shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 2/SB 160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly that all public employers and contractors at every tier and level use the federal work authorization program on all projects, jobs, and work resulting from any bid or contract and that every public employer and contractor working for a public employer take all possible steps to ensure that a legal and eligible workforce is utilized in accordance with federal immigration and employment.”

13-10-91.
Verification of new employee eligibility; applicability; rules and regulations.

Every public employer, including, but not limited to, every municipality and county, shall register and participate in the federal work authorization program to verify employment eligibility of all newly hired employees. Upon federal authorization, a public employer shall permanently post the employer’s federally issued user identification number and date of authorization, as established by the agreement for authorization, on the employer’s website; provided, however, that if a local public employer does not maintain a website, then the local government shall submit such information to the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia to be posted by the institute on the website created for local government audit and budget reporting. The Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia shall maintain the information submitted and provide instructions and submission guidelines for local governments. State departments, agencies, or instrumentalities may satisfy the requirement of this Code section by posting information required by this Code section on one website maintained and operated by the state.

A public employer shall not enter into a contract for the physical performance of services unless the contractor registers and participates in the federal work authorization program. Before a bid for any such service is considered by a public employer, the bid shall include a signed, notarized affidavit from the contractor attesting to the following:

The affiant has registered with, is authorized to use, and uses the federal work authorization program;

The user identification number and date of authorization for the affiant;

The affiant will continue to use the federal work authorization program throughout the contract period; and

The affiant will contract for the physical performance of services in satisfaction of such contract only with subcontractors who present an affidavit to the contractor with the same information required by subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of this paragraph.

A contractor shall not enter into any contract with a public employer for the physical performance of services unless the contractor registers and participates in the federal work authorization program.

A subcontractor shall not enter into any contract with a contractor unless such subcontractor registers and participates in the federal work authorization program. A subcontractor shall submit, at the time of such contract, an affidavit to the contractor in the same manner and with the same information required in paragraph (1) of this subsection. It shall be the duty of any subcontractor receiving an affidavit from a sub-subcontractor to forward notice to the contractor of the receipt, within five business days of receipt, of such affidavit. It shall be the duty of a subcontractor receiving notice of receipt of an affidavit from any sub-subcontractor that has contracted with a sub-subcontractor to forward, within five business days of receipt, a copy of such notice to the contractor.

A sub-subcontractor shall not enter into any contract with a subcontractor or sub-subcontractor unless such sub-subcontractor registers and participates in the federal work authorization program. A sub-subcontractor shall submit, at the time of such contract, an affidavit to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor with whom such sub-subcontractor has privity of contract, in the same manner and with the same information required in paragraph (1) of this subsection. It shall be the duty of any sub-subcontractor to forward notice of receipt of any affidavit from a sub-subcontractor to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor with whom such receiving sub-subcontractor has privity of contract.

In lieu of the affidavit required by this subsection, a contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor who has no employees and does not hire or intend to hire employees for purposes of satisfying or completing the terms and conditions of any part or all of the original contract with the public employer shall instead provide a copy of the state issued driver’s license or state issued identification card of such contracting party and a copy of the state issued driver’s license or identification card of each independent contractor utilized in the satisfaction of part or all of the original contract with a public employer. A driver’s license or identification card shall only be accepted in lieu of an affidavit if it is issued by a state within the United States and such state verifies lawful immigration status prior to issuing a driver’s license or identification card. For purposes of satisfying the requirements of this subsection, copies of such driver’s license or identification card shall be forwarded to the public employer, contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor in the same manner as an affidavit and notice of receipt of an affidavit as required by paragraphs (1), (3), and (4) of this subsection. Not later than July 1, 2011, the Attorney General shall provide a list of the states that verify immigration status prior to the issuance of a driver’s license or identification card and that only issue licenses or identification cards to persons lawfully present in the United States. The list of verified state drivers’ licenses and identification cards shall be posted on the website of the State Law Department and updated annually thereafter. In the event that a contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor later determines that he or she will need to hire employees to satisfy or complete the physical performance of services under an applicable contract, then he or she shall first be required to comply with the affidavit requirements of this subsection.

It shall be the duty of the contractor to submit copies of all affidavits, drivers’ licenses, and identification cards required pursuant to this subsection to the public employer within five business days of receipt. No later than August 1, 2011, the Departments of Audits and Accounts shall create and post on its website form affidavits for the federal work authorization program. The affidavits shall require fields for the following information: the name of the project, the name of the contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor, the name of the public employer, and the employment eligibility information required pursuant to this subsection.

Public employers subject to the requirements of this subsection shall provide an annual report to the Department of Audits and Accounts pursuant to Code Section 50-36-4 as proof of compliance with this subsection. Subject to available funding, the state auditor shall conduct annual compliance audits on a minimum of at least one-half of the reporting agencies and publish the results of such audits annually on the Department of Audits and Accounts’ website on or before September 30.

If the state auditor finds a political subdivision to be in violation of this subsection, such political subdivision shall be provided 30 days to demonstrate to the state auditor that such political subdivision has corrected all deficiencies and is in compliance with this subsection. If, after 30 days, the political subdivision has failed to correct all deficiencies, such political subdivision shall be excluded from the list of qualified local governments under Chapter 8 of Title 50 until such time as the political subdivision demonstrates to the state auditor that such political subdivision has corrected all deficiencies and is in compliance with this subsection.

At any time after the state auditor finds a political subdivision to be in violation of this subsection, such political subdivision may seek administrative relief through the Office of State Administrative Hearings. If a political subdivision seeks administrative relief, the time for correcting deficiencies shall be tolled, and any action to exclude the political subdivision from the list of qualified governments under Chapter 8 of Title 50 shall be suspended until such time as a final ruling upholding the findings of the state auditor is issued.

A new compliance report submitted to the state auditor by the political subdivision shall be deemed satisfactory and shall correct the prior deficient compliance report so long as the new report fully complies with this subsection.

No political subdivision of this state shall be found to be in violation of this subsection by the state auditor as a result of any actions of a county constitutional officer.

If the state auditor finds any political subdivision which is a state department or agency to be in violation of the provisions of this subsection twice in a five-year period, the funds appropriated to such state department or agency for the fiscal year following the year in which the agency was found to be in violation for the second time shall be not greater than 90 percent of the amount so appropriated in the second year of such noncompliance. Any political subdivision found to be in violation of the provisions of this subsection shall be listed on www.open.georgia.gov or another official state website with an indication and explanation of each violation.

Contingent upon appropriation or approval of necessary funding and in order to verify compliance with the provisions of this subsection, each year the Commissioner shall conduct no fewer than 100 random audits of public employers and contractors or may conduct such an audit upon reasonable grounds to suspect a violation of this subsection. The results of the audits shall be published on the www.open.georgia.gov website and on the Georgia Department of Labor’s website no later than December 31 of each year. The Georgia Department of Labor shall seek funding from the United States Secretary of Labor to the extent such funding is available.

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement in an affidavit submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be guilty of a violation of Code Section 16-10-20 and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in such Code section. Contractors, subcontractors, sub-subcontractors, and any person convicted for false statements based on a violation of this subsection shall be prohibited from bidding on or entering into any public contract for 12 months following such conviction. A contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor that has been found by the Commissioner to have violated this subsection shall be listed by the Department of Labor on www.open.georgia.gov or other official website of the state with public information regarding such violation, including the identity of the violator, the nature of the contract, and the date of conviction. A public employee, contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor shall not be held civilly liable or criminally responsible for unknowingly or unintentionally accepting a bid from or contracting with a contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor acting in violation of this subsection. Any contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor found by the Commissioner to have violated this subsection shall, on a second or subsequent violations, be prohibited from bidding on or entering into any public contract for 12 months following the date of such finding.

There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a public employer, contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor receiving and acting upon an affidavit conforming to the content requirements of this subsection does so in good faith, and such public employer, contractor, subcontractor, or sub-subcontractor may rely upon such affidavit as being true and correct. The affidavit shall be admissible in any court of law for the purpose of establishing such presumption.

Documents required by this Code section may be submitted electronically, provided the submission complies with Chapter 12 of Title 10.

This Code section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, the Commissioner shall prescribe forms and promulgate rules and regulations deemed necessary in order to administer and effectuate this Code section and publish such rules and regulations on the Georgia Department of Labor’s website.

The commissioner of the Georgia Department of Transportation shall prescribe all forms and promulgate rules and regulations deemed necessary for the application of this Code section to any contract or agreement relating to public transportation and shall publish such rules and regulations on the Georgia Department of Transportation’s website.

No employer or agency or political subdivision, as such term is defined in Code Section 50-36-1, shall be subject to lawsuit or liability arising from any act to comply with the requirements of this Code section.

An affidavit required by this subsection shall be considered an open public record once a public employer has entered into a contract for physical performance of services; provided, however, that any information protected from public disclosure by federal law or by Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 shall be redacted. Affidavits shall be maintained by the public employer for five years from the date of receipt.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-91, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 2/SB 529; Ga. L. 2009, p. 970, § 1/HB 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 308, § 2.A/SB 447; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 3/HB 87; Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 3/SB 160.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, rewrote subsections (a) and (b) and added subsection (f).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the undesignated paragraph of paragraph (b)(1), inserted “physical performance of”, inserted “or by Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50”, and added the last sentence; in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “or a contractor of a public employer” and added the last sentence; and added paragraphs (b)(3) through (b)(5). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in subsection (a), substituted “then the local government shall submit such information to the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia to be posted by the institute on the website created for local government audit and budget reporting” for “the identification number and date of authorization shall be published annually in the official legal organ for the county” at the end of the second sentence and added the third sentence; in the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1), substituted “A public” for “No public”, inserted “not”, deleted “within this state” following “performance of services”, and deleted “to verify information of all newly hired employees or subcontractors” following “authorization program”; in subparagraph (b)(1)(A), substituted a comma for “and” and inserted “, and uses”; deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(B); in subparagraph (b)(1)(C), deleted “is using and” following “The affiant” at the beginning and added “; and” at the end; added subparagraph (b)(1)(D); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (b)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “No contractor or subcontractor who enters a contract pursuant to this chapter with a public employer or a contractor of a public employer shall enter into such a contract or subcontract in connection with the physical performance of services within this state unless the contractor or subcontractor registers and participates in the federal work authorization program to verify information of all newly hired employees. Any employee, contractor, or subcontractor of such contractor or subcontractor shall also be required to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph.”; substituted the present provisions of paragraph (b)(3) for the former provisions, which read: “Upon contracting with a new subcontractor, a contractor or subcontractor shall, as a condition of any contract or subcontract entered into pursuant to this chapter, provide a public employer with notice of the identity of any and all subsequent subcontractors hired or contracted by that contractor or subcontractor. Such notice shall be provided within five business days of entering into a contract or agreement for hire with any subcontractor. Such notice shall include an affidavit from each subsequent contractor attesting to the subcontractor’s name, address, user identification number, and date of authorization to use the federal work authorization program.”; added paragraphs (b)(4) through (b)(7); redesignated former paragraphs (b)(4) and (b)(5) as present paragraphs (b)(8) and (b)(9), respectively; added “or may conduct such an audit upon reasonable grounds to suspect a violation of this subsection” at the end of the first sentence in paragraph (b)(8); in paragraph (b)(9), in the second sentence, substituted a comma for “and” and inserted “sub-subcontractors, and any person”, and added the third through fifth sentences; and added paragraphs (b)(10) and (b)(11). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in the introductory paragraph of paragraph (b)(1), deleted “pursuant to this chapter” following “into a contract” in the first sentence;
in subparagraph (b)(7)(A), deleted the former first and second sentences, which read: “Not later than December 31 of each year, a public employer shall submit a compliance report to the state auditor certifying compliance with the provisions of this subsection. Such compliance report shall contain the public employer’s federal work authorization program verification user number and date of authorization and the legal name, address, and federal work authorization program user number of the contractor and the date of the contract between the contractor and public employer.”, added the present first sentence, and substituted “Department of Audits and Accounts’ ” for “department’s” near the end of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 308, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to contracts which are first advertised or otherwise given public notice on or after July 1, 2010.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) If any provision or part of any provision of this Act or the application of the same is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of this Act or any other part of this Act than can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this Act are severable.

“(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c) The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment by that Act shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 2/SB 160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly that all public employers and contractors at every tier and level use the federal work authorization program on all projects, jobs, and work resulting from any bid or contract and that every public employer and contractor working for a public employer take all possible steps to ensure that a legal and eligible workforce is utilized in accordance with federal immigration and employment.”